Vermont, session 2025-2026, H438.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 9743 is amended to read:
§ 9743. ORGANIZATIONS NOT COVERED
Any sale, service, or admission to a place of entertainment charged by or to
any of the following or any use by any of the following are not subject to the
sales and use taxes imposed under this chapter:
* * *
(4)(A) Sales of building materials and supplies to be used in the
construction, reconstruction, alteration, remodeling, or repair of:
VT LEG #380996 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.438
2025 Page 2 of 3
(i) any building structure, or other public works owned by or held
in trust for the benefit of any governmental body or agency mentioned in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section and used exclusively for public
purposes;
(ii) any building or structure owned by or held in trust for the
benefit of any organization described in subdivision (3) and used exclusively
for the purposes upon which its exempt status is based; and
(iii) any building or structure owned by any “local development
corporation” as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 212(10) and used exclusively for the
purposes authorized in 10 V.S.A. chapter 12; provided, however, that the
governmental body or agency, the organization, or the development
corporation has first obtained a certificate from the Commissioner stating that
it is entitled to the exemption, and the vendor keeps a record of the sales price
of each separate sale, the name of the purchaser, the date of each separate sale,
and the number of the certificate; and
(iv) any priority housing project as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001.
(B) As used in this subdivision, the words “building materials and
supplies” include all materials and supplies consumed, employed, or expended
in the construction, reconstruction, alteration, remodeling, or repair of any
building, structure, or other public work, as well as the materials and supplies
physically incorporated therein.
VT LEG #380996 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.438
2025 Page 3 of 3
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380996 v.1